Washington statutes.
RCW 36.90.010

Control of property.

The property of the Southwest Washington Fair Association including the buildings and structures thereon, as constructed or as may be built or constructed from time to time, or any alterations or additions thereto, shall be under the jurisdiction of Lewis county. That property will be under the management and control of the board of county commissioners of Lewis county or that board's designee, for fair and county purposes.

[ 2024 c 75 s 1; 1998 c 107 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.90.010. Prior: 1913 c 47 s 2; RRS s 2746.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 97: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 8.]